Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2878.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 25.341, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin May employ licensed veterinarian. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding section 156.11, a person required to obtain a commercial feed license under this section may employ a person licensed to practice veterinary medicine in this state and is not required to organize pursuant to the Minnesota Professional Firms Act under chapter 319B. A veterinarian employed under this subdivision may practice veterinary medicine for, or provide veterinary services to, the commercial feed licensee's customers. new text end